New York, session 2025-2026, S4649.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 1800 of the vehicle and traffic law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision (j) to read as follows: 3 (j) Every person convicted of a violation of the provisions of section 4 eleven hundred forty-four-a of this chapter shall for a first conviction 5 thereof be punished by a fine of not more than two hundred seventy-five 6 dollars or by imprisonment for not more than fifteen days or by both 7 such fine and imprisonment. For a conviction of a second violation, both 8 of which were committed within a period of eighteen months, such person 9 shall be punished by a fine of not more than four hundred fifty dollars 10 or by imprisonment for not more than forty-five days or by both such 11 fine and imprisonment. For a conviction of a third or subsequent 12 violation, all of which were committed within a period of eighteen 13 months, such person shall be punished by a fine of not more than seven 14 hundred fifty dollars or by imprisonment for not more than ninety days 15 or by both such fine and imprisonment. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect January 1, 2026 and shall apply to 17 violations committed on and after such date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06998-05-5